Louisiana, session 2026, HB599.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:961(L) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§961. Cooperative endeavor agreements; withdrawal of surface water; intent
* * *
L. Nothing contained in this Section shall be construed as authorizing the
sale of running surface water owned by the state of Louisiana for use outside of the
state.
Section 2. R.S. 30:961(I) is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-120 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 599